Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-119] Unlawful enlistment,
appointment, or separation. Any person subject to this chapter who effects
an enlistment or appointment in or a separation from the state military forces
of any person who is known to the person to be ineligible for that enlistment,
appointment, or separation because it is prohibited by law, rule, or order
shall be punished as a court-martial may direct. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen
ch 1985]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next